District of Columbia statutes.
26-551.09

Weight of advice of the Board.

If the Commissioner does not follow advice of the Board which is part of an official action of the Board, the Commissioner shall send to the Board a written statement of the reason for his or her decision not to follow the advice.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 109, 48 DCR 3244